Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.921

Construction—1975 1st ex.s. c 178, RCW 41.16.145.

(1) The provisions of this section are procedural and remedial.

(2) The application and effect of chapter 178, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. shall be retroactive to and including May 6, 1974. Each benefit being paid on June 4, 1975, shall then be adjusted as if chapter 178, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. had been in existence since May 6, 1974. Additionally, any amounts which would have been paid had chapter 178, Laws of 1975 1st ex. sess. been in effect since May 6, 1974, shall then be due as a one-time lump sum payment.

(3) The provisions of RCW 41.16.145 shall be construed and read to have granted the percentage increase provided by that section to those receiving benefits pursuant to RCW 41.16.230, until and including July 1, 1974, at which time those persons shall be regarded as eligible for the benefits granted by chapter 190, Laws of 1974 ex. sess., as provided in subsection (2) of this section. Any amounts now payable due to a failure to so construe and read RCW 41.16.145 are now due as a one-time lump sum payment.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 178 s 5.]